Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1303
Unclaimed funds held and owing by a life insurance corporation; presumed abandoned; when.

(a) Unclaimed funds, as defined in this section, held and owing by a life insurance corporation shall be presumed abandoned if the last-known address, according to the records of the corporation, of the person entitled to the funds is within this state. If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the funds and no address of such person is known to the corporation or if it is not definite and certain from the records of the corporation what person is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last-known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last-known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the corporation.

(b) Unclaimed funds, as used in this section, means all money held and owing by any life insurance corporation unclaimed and unpaid for more than five years after the money became due and payable as established from the records of the corporation under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract which has matured or terminated. A life insurance policy not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured is deemed to be matured and the proceeds thereof are deemed to be due and payable if such policy was in force when the insured attained the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based, unless the person appearing entitled thereto has within the preceding five years, (1) assigned, readjusted, or paid premiums on the policy, or subjected the policy to loan, or (2) corresponded in writing with the life insurance corporation concerning the policy. Money otherwise payable according to the records of the corporation are deemed due and payable although the policy or contract has not been surrendered as required.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 3, p. 2480;

Laws 1977, LB 305, § 2;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 5.